furlan.dic
abati/IEF
abolî/M
abortî/M
abulî/M
aburî/M
acanî/M
adempî/M
aderî/M
agjî/M
agradî/M
ambî/M
amonî/M
apartignî/N
aparî/M
aplaudî/M
aprofondî/M
ardî/M
arsî/M
assorbî/M
atignî/N
atribuî/M
aurî/M
avertî/M
avilî/M
bandî/M
benedî/M
bipartî/M
bombî/M
brunî/M
brustulî/M
bruî/M
bulî/M
bunî/M
burî/M
candî/M
capî/M
cernî/M
cerpî/M
clarî/M
clipî/M
clucî/M
clupî/M
cognossi/ELF
colorî/M
colpî/M
combati/IEF
comparî/M
compatî/M
complî/M
comprendi/IEF
comprometi/IEF
compî/M
concepî/M
concludi/ELF
condividi/ELF
coneti/IEF
conferî/M
confluî/M
consisti/IEF
contignî/N
contosî/M
contraponi/IEF
contravignî/N
contribuî/M
convertî/M
convignî/N
convinci/IEF
corispuindi/IEF
corompi/IHE
costituî/M
costruî/M
coviglî/M
cufulî/M
cumplî/M
cunvignî/N
custodî/M
debolî/M
decidi/ELF
decori/IEF
definî/M
deludi/ELF
dentî/M
deprimi/IEF
desisti/IEF
destituî/M
detignî/N
dicerni/IEF
difondi/IEF
digjerî/M
diluî/M
dimagrî/M
diminuî/M
dipendi/IEF
disbombî/M
discolorî/M
discomparî/M
discomponi/IEF
disconvinci/IEF
discoragjî/M
discoviglî/M
discrudulî/M
discunî/M
discuti/IEF
disdurmidî/M
disflorî/M
disfridi/ELF
disfurnî/M
disingrisignî/M
dislizerî/M
dismatî/M
dismeti/IEF
dispartî/M
disparî/M
disponi/IEF
dissapulî/M
dissavî/M
dissepulî/M
dissuadi/ELF
distindi/IEF
distribuî/M
disubidî/M
disunî/M
disvidrinî/M
disvinidrî/M
divertî/M
dividi/ELF
divignî/N
elidi/ELF
empî/M
erizi/HEL
esaudî/M
esaurî/M
eseguî/M
esibî/M
esisti/IEF
esizi/ELF
esponi/IEF
esprimi/IEF
falî/M
farsî/M
fastidî/M
favorî/M
ferî/M
flapî/M
florî/M
flurî/M
fluî/M
fondi/IEF
fondî/M
foti/IEF
fraidî/M
frastî/M
fremi/IEF
frolî/M
fundî/M
furnî/M
garantî/M
gjestî/M
gjoldi/IEF
glanzî/M
gloti/IEF
glutî/M
gradî/M
guarnî/M
iludi/ELF
imatunî/M
imbacuchî/M
imbambinî/M
imbarî/M
imbasoalî/M
imbastî/M
imbechî/M
imberlumî/M
imberlî/M
imbestialî/M
imbombî/M
imbonî/M
imbotî/M
imbramî/M
imbrumî/M
imbrunî/M
imbunî/M
imburî/M
impanî/M
imparcevi/ELF
impedî/M
impenzî/M
impetrî/M
impicotî/M
impintî/M
impisulî/M
impiçulî/M
implenî/M
imponi/IEF
improibî/M
imprometi/IEF
impuarî/M
inacidî/M
inaridî/M
inasprî/M
incacî/M
incagnî/M
incancarî/M
incandî/M
incendi/IabEF
incindi/IEF
incjarî/M
includi/ELF
incocalî/M
incolorî/M
incontosî/M
incoragjî/M
incragnî/M
inculurî/M
indebolî/M
indisponi/IEF
indolcî/M
indulcî/M
indulî/M
indurmidî/M
indurî/M
infastidî/M
infissî/M
inflapî/M
inflossî/M
influî/M
infondî/M
infraidessi/ELF
infraidî/M
inframeti/IEF
infuarcî/M
infuartî/M
infundî/M
ingarbî/M
ingherbî/M
ingjalî/M
ingjelosî/M
ingjerî/M
inglutî/M
ingnervosî/M
ingobî/M
ingolosî/M
ingosî/M
ingrandî/M
ingrisignî/M
ingrisî/M
ingrocjî/M
ingruessî/M
ingrugnî/M
ingusî/M
inibî/M
inliparî/M
inmarumî/M
inmatunî/M
inmatî/M
inmufî/M
inmusonî/M
inombrî/M
inricjî/M
inrochî/M
inrusinî/M
insavorî/M
insemenî/M
inserî/M
insisti/IEF
insordî/M
insospetî/M
instituî/M
instupidî/M
insunî/M
insuperbî/M
insurdî/M
insuspietî/M
insutilî/M
intenerî/M
interompi/IHE
interorî/M
interponi/IEF
intertignî/N
intervignî/MN
intignî/N
intimidî/M
intindi/IEF
intorgulî/M
intratignî/N
intravignî/N
intristulî/M
intristî/M
intrunî/M
inturgulî/M
intuî/M
invecjî/M
invedranî/M
invertî/M
investî/M
invidricî/M
invidrignî/M
invistî/MF
invuatî/M
inzelosî/M
inzentilî/M
inçompedî/M
inçuchî/M
inçurvilî/M
inçussî/M
istituî/M
istruî/M
jessi/IEF
laî/M
lidi/eELF
lizerî/M
lusi/ELF
lusî/M
madurî/M
malcapî/M
maledî/M
malpaidî/M
maludî/M
mantignî/N
marcî/M
meti/IEF
mintî/M
morbidî/M
mufî/M
munî/M
mutulî/M
muî/M
nassi/IEF
nichilî/M
nosi/ELF
nudrî/M
obedî/M
ombrî/M
ometi/IEF
ostruî/M
otignî/N
paidî/M
palombî/M
pandi/IEF
partignî/N
parturî/M
partî/M
parî/M
passi/IEF
patuî/M
patî/M
penzî/M
percepî/M
percori/IEF
percuisî/M
perseguî/M
persisti/IEF
perî/M
pierdi/IEF
plasi/ELF
pondi/IEF
posponi/IEF
possedi/ELF
precedi/ELF
precostituî/M
predilizi/ELF
preferî/M
premi/IbEF
premunî/M
preponi/IEF
presagjî/M
prestabilî/M
presumi/IEF
presuponi/IEF
preterî/M
pretindi/IEF
prevignî/N
procedi/ELF
profondi/IEF
profondî/M
progredî/M
proibî/M
prolî/M
proponi/IEF
prostituî/M
provignî/N
proviodi/ELF
pulî/M
punî/M
rapî/M
rarî/M
raviodi/ELF
reagjî/M
realdî/M
rebechî/M
recedi/ELF
recuisî/M
redimi/IEF
reperî/M
replî/M
reprimi/IEF
resisti/IEF
restituî/M
resurî/M
retribuî/M
riassumi/IEF
ribati/IEF
ricjadi/ELF
ricognossi/ELF
ricostruî/M
ricrodi/ELF
ridi/bELF
riferî/M
rifinî/M
rifleti/IEF
rifondi/IEF
rifurnî/M
rimeti/IEF
rincressi/ELF
rindi/IEF
rinfuarcî/M
rinfuartî/M
rinsavî/M
rinvignî/N
rinzovenî/M
ripartî/M
risarcî/M
rispuindi/IEF
ristabilî/M
ristrenzi/IHEF
risurî/M
ritignî/N
riunî/M
rivendi/IEF
riverî/M
rivignî/N
rivistî/MF
rompi/IHE
rugnî/M
rusinî/M
rustî/M
sabulî/M
sapulî/M
sarî/M
saurî/M
savorî/M
sbaldî/M
sbandî/M
sbarlufî/M
sbasî/M
sbati/IEF
sberlufî/M
scaltrî/M
scarmulî/M
scarmî/M
scaturî/M
scjalterî/M
scjuvî/M
sclagnî/M
sclarî/M
scludi/ELF
scludî/M
sclupî/M
scombati/IEF
scometi/IEF
scompartî/M
scomparî/M
sconfondi/IEF
scridelî/M
scuaî/M
scuedi/ELF
sculpî/M
scunî/M
scurî/M
secerni/IEF
seguî/M
sepulî/M
servî/M
sfinî/M
sflorî/M
sfurnî/M
sgardufî/M
sgjarpî/M
siervi/IEF
slancî/M
slanghî/M
slizerî/M
slusî/M
smagrî/M
smamî/M
smarî/M
smavî/M
smelcî/M
smentî/M
smeti/IEF
sminuî/M
smuartî/M
someti/IEF
soreponi/IEF
sorevinci/IEF
sospendi/IEF
sospindi/IEF
sostignî/N
sostituî/M
sotponi/IEF
sovignî/N
spartî/M
sparî/M
spaurî/M
spedî/M
spierdi/IEF
spontî/M
spuntî/M
srarî/M
stabilî/M
stiernî/M
stracapî/M
strafuî/M
stralusi/ELF
stralusî/M
strambî/M
stramurtî/M
stramî/M
strangussî/M
stranî/M
stratignî/N
straviodi/ELF
stravistî/MF
strissignî/M
strissinî/M
stupî/M
sturbî/M
sturnî/M
subî/M
sucedi/ELF
sudividi/ELF
sugjerî/M
suplî/M
survignî/N
suspindi/IEF
sussisti/IEF
svampî/M
sveltî/M
svendi/IEF
svilî/M
tiessi/IEF
tignî/N
tornî/M
tradî/M
trascori/IEF
trasferî/M
trasgredî/M
trasmeti/IEF
trasparî/M
trasvistî/MF
tratignî/N
travignî/N
travistî/MF
tribuî/M
ubidî/M
uldî/M
umidî/M
unî/M
urdî/M
usufruî/M
vandi/IEF
vati/IEF
vestî/M
viesti/IEF
viestî/M
vignî/N
vilipendi/IbEF
vistî/MF
vivi/ELF
vuarnî/M
vuarî/M
zemi/IEF
